Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 4

Litter Prevention and Control

54-1-401. Litter prevention and control.

In recognition of the exorbitant societal costs associated with littering and in the interest of a cleaner, more beautiful Tennessee, the department of transportation is authorized to establish a litter prevention and control program.

Acts 2005, ch. 128, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 4.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted “to be known as ‘Don't Trash Tennessee’” from the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Litter control, § 39-14-501 et seq.

Litter prevention and control, § 4-7-301 et seq.

54-1-402. Citizen reporting of littering.

The litter prevention and control program may include as one (1) of its components a process by which citizens can report directly to the department of transportation instances of persons littering from motor vehicles onto the state's roads and highways, whether the offenders are intentionally littering or are accidentally dropping objects or debris from an uncovered or improperly secured load. The process may provide the capability for citizens to report litterers online by means of the completion of a standard form, the form to be accessed via the Internet from the program's web site. The department may also make provisions for citizens to report litterers via e-mail and a toll-free telephone line.

Acts 2005, ch. 128, § 2; 2013, ch. 308, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. The toll-free number referred to in this section is 1-877-8-LITTER (1-877-854-8837).

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “The litter prevention and control program” for “The ‘Don't Trash Tennessee’ program” at the beginning.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

54-1-403. Minimum information in a report — Confidentiality.

When reporting litterers to the department of transportation, whether via the Internet, e-mail or telephone, citizens shall provide the following information, at a minimum:

The offender's motor vehicle registration number, Tennessee plates only;

The make and model of the offender's motor vehicle;

The date and time of day the littering offense occurred;

The approximate location at which the littering offense occurred;

The person or entity who committed the littering offense, whether driver, passenger or accidental discharge from a load; and

The item or items improperly discharged from the motor vehicle that are the basis for the littering offense.

Litter reports, whether made via the Internet, e-mail or telephone, shall be deemed confidential. Neither the identity of the person making the report, nor the specific information compiled in the report, shall be available to any person other than an official or employee of the department having responsibility in the administration and enforcement of the program.

Acts 2005, ch. 128, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The toll-free number referred to in this section is 1-877-8-LITTER (1-877-854-8837).

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

54-1-404. Verification of reported motor registration number and notification of owner or lessee of vehicle.

Upon receipt of the information required by § 54-1-403, the department of transportation may verify the reported motor vehicle registration number through the department of safety. Upon completing verification, if possible, the department of transportation may mail a letter to the owner or lessee of the motor vehicle at the address affiliated with the registration number. The letter may inform the owner or lessee of the motor vehicle that a concerned citizen has reported witnessing the commission of a littering offense from the motor vehicle. The letter may strongly discourage the owner or lessee from committing a subsequent littering offense or allowing a subsequent littering offense to be committed from the person's motor vehicle and warn the owner or lessee of the penalties for littering under Tennessee law.

Acts 2005, ch. 128, § 4.

54-1-405. Construction — Expenditure of funds.

This part shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to this part, unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Acts 2005, ch. 128, § 5.

54-1-406. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of §§ 54-1-401 — 54-1-404. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2005, ch. 128, § 6.